tests/wiki.yaml
  "Сӑмах ҫурт":
    ҫурт<n><nom> :  ҫурт 
    ҫурт<n><gen> :  ҫуртӑн 
    ҫурт<n><dat> :  ҫурта 
    ҫурт<n><loc> :  ҫуртра 
    ҫурт<n><abl> :  ҫуртран 
    ҫурт<n><ins> :  ҫуртпа 
    ҫурт<n><abe> :  ҫуртсӑр 
    ҫурт<n><ben> :  ҫуртшӑн
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><nom> :  ҫуртӑм 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><gen> :  ҫуртӑмӑн 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><dat> :  ҫуртӑма 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><loc> :  ҫуртӑмра 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><abl> :  ҫуртӑмран 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><ins> :  ҫуртӑмпа 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><abe> :  ҫуртӑмсӑр 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><ben> :  ҫуртӑмшӑн
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><nom> :  ҫурту 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><gen> :  ҫуртун 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><dat> :  ҫуртна
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><loc> :  ҫуртунта 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><abl> :  ҫуртунтан 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><ins> :  ҫуртупа 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><abe> :  ҫуртусӑр 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><ben> :  ҫуртушӑн
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><nom> :  ҫурчӗ 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><gen> :  ҫурчӗн 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><dat> :  ҫуртне 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><loc> :  ҫурчӗнче 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><abl> :  ҫурчӗнчен 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><ins> :  ҫурчӗпе 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><abe> :  ҫурчӗсӗр 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><ben> :  ҫурчӗшӗн
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><nom> :  ҫуртӑмӑр 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><gen> :  ҫуртӑмӑрӑн 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><dat> :  ҫуртӑмӑра 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><loc> :  ҫуртӑмӑрта 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><abl> :  ҫуртӑмӑртан 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><ins> :  ҫуртӑмӑрпа 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><abe> :  ҫуртӑмӑрсӑр 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><ben> :  ҫуртӑмӑршӑн
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><nom> :  ҫуртӑр 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><gen> :  ҫуртӑрӑн 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><dat> :  ҫуртӑра 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><loc> :  ҫуртӑрта 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><abl> :  ҫуртӑртан 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><ins> :  ҫуртӑрпа 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><abe> :  ҫуртӑрсӑр 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><ben> :  ҫуртӑршӑн
    ҫурт<n><pl><nom> :  ҫуртсем 
    ҫурт<n><pl><gen> :  ҫуртсен 
    ҫурт<n><pl><dat> :  ҫуртсене 
    ҫурт<n><pl><loc> :  ҫуртсенче 
    ҫурт<n><pl><abl> :  ҫуртсенчен 
    ҫурт<n><pl><ins> :  ҫуртсемпе 
    ҫурт<n><pl><abe> :  ҫуртсемсӗр 
    ҫурт<n><pl><ben> :  ҫуртсемшӗн
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  ҫуртӑмсем 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  ҫуртӑмсен 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  ҫуртӑмсене 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  ҫуртӑмсенче 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  ҫуртӑмсенчен 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  ҫуртӑмсемпе 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  ҫуртӑмсемсӗр 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  ҫуртӑмсемшӗн
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  ҫуртусем 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  ҫуртусен 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  ҫуртусене 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  ҫуртусенче 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  ҫуртусенчен 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  ҫуртусемпе 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  ҫуртусемсӗр 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  ҫуртусемшӗн
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  ҫурчӗсем 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  ҫурчӗсен 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  ҫурчӗсене 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  ҫурчӗсенче 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  ҫурчӗсенчен 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  ҫурчӗсемпе 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  ҫурчӗсемсӗр 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  ҫурчӗсемшӗн
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  ҫуртӑмӑрсем 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  ҫуртӑмӑрсен 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  ҫуртӑмӑрсене 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  ҫуртӑмӑрсенче 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  ҫуртӑмӑрсенчен 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  ҫуртӑмӑрсемпе 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  ҫуртӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  ҫуртӑмӑрсемшӗн
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  ҫуртӑрсем 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  ҫуртӑрсен 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  ҫуртӑрсене 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  ҫуртӑрсенче 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  ҫуртӑрсенчен 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  ҫуртӑрсемпе 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  ҫуртӑрсемсӗр 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  ҫуртӑрсемшӗн

  "Сӑмах ҫын":
    ҫын<n><nom> :  ҫын 
    ҫын<n><gen> :  ҫыннӑн 
    ҫын<n><dat> :  ҫынна 
    ҫын<n><loc> :  ҫынра 
    ҫын<n><abl> :  ҫынран
    ҫын<n><ins> :  ҫынпа 
    ҫын<n><abe> :  ҫынсӑр 
    ҫын<n><ben> :  ҫыншӑн
    ҫын<n><px1sg><nom> :  ҫыннӑм 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><gen> :  ҫыннӑмӑн 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><dat> :  ҫыннӑма 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><loc> :  ҫыннӑмра 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><abl> :  ҫыннӑмран 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><ins> :  ҫыннӑмпа 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><abe> :  ҫыннӑмсӑр 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><ben> :  ҫыннӑмшӑн
    ҫын<n><px2sg><nom> :  ҫынну 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><gen> :  ҫыннун 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><dat> :  ҫыннуна 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><loc> :  ҫыннунта 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><abl> :  ҫыннунтан 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><ins> :  ҫыннупа 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><abe> :  ҫыннусӑр 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><ben> :  ҫыннушӑн
    ҫын<n><px3sp><nom> :  ҫынни 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><gen> :  ҫыннин 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><dat> :  ҫыннине 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><loc> :  ҫыннинче 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><abl> :  ҫыннинчен 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><ins> :  ҫыннипе 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><abe> :  ҫыннисӗр 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><ben> :  ҫыннишӗн
    ҫын<n><px1pl><nom> :  ҫыннӑмӑр 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><gen> :  ҫыннӑмӑрӑн 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><dat> :  ҫыннӑмӑра 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><loc> :  ҫыннӑмӑрта 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><abl> :  ҫыннӑмӑртан 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><ins> :  ҫыннӑмӑрпа 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><abe> :  ҫыннӑмӑрсӑр 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><ben> :  ҫыннӑмӑршӑн
    ҫын<n><px2pl><nom> :  ҫыннӑр 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><gen> :  ҫыннӑрӑн 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><dat> :  ҫыннӑра 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><loc> :  ҫыннӑрта 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><abl> :  ҫыннӑртан 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><ins> :  ҫыннӑрпа 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><abe> :  ҫыннӑрсӑр 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><ben> :  ҫыннӑршӑн
    ҫын<n><pl><nom> :  ҫынсем 
    ҫын<n><pl><gen> :  ҫынсен 
    ҫын<n><pl><dat> :  ҫынсене 
    ҫын<n><pl><loc> :  ҫынсенче 
    ҫын<n><pl><abl> :  ҫынсенчен 
    ҫын<n><pl><ins> :  ҫынсемпе 
    ҫын<n><pl><abe> :  ҫынсемсӗр 
    ҫын<n><pl><ben> :  ҫынсемшӗн
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  ҫыннӑмсем 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  ҫыннӑмсен 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  ҫыннӑмсене 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  ҫыннӑмсенче 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  ҫыннӑмсенчен 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  ҫыннӑмсемпе 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  ҫыннӑмсемсӗр 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  ҫыннӑмсемшӗн
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  ҫыннусем 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  ҫыннусен 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  ҫыннусене 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  ҫыннусенче 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  ҫыннусенчен 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  ҫыннусемпе 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  ҫыннусемсӗр 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  ҫыннусемшӗн
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  ҫыннисем 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  ҫыннисен 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  ҫыннисене 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  ҫыннисенче 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  ҫыннисенчен 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  ҫыннисемпе 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  ҫыннисемсӗр 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  ҫыннисемшӗн
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  ҫыннӑмӑрсем 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  ҫыннӑмӑрсен 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  ҫыннӑмӑрсене 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  ҫыннӑмӑрсенче 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  ҫыннӑмӑрсенчен 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  ҫыннӑмӑрсемпе 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  ҫыннӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  ҫыннӑмӑрсемшӗн
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  ҫыннӑрсем 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  ҫыннӑрсен 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  ҫыннӑрсене 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  ҫыннӑрсенче 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  ҫыннӑрсенчен 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  ҫыннӑрсемпе 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  ҫыннӑрсемсӗр 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  ҫыннӑрсемшӗн

  "Сӑмах ӗҫ":
    ӗҫ<n><nom> :  ӗҫ 
    ӗҫ<n><gen> :  ӗҫӗн 
    ӗҫ<n><dat> :  ӗҫе 
    ӗҫ<n><loc> :  ӗҫре 
    ӗҫ<n><abl> :  ӗҫрен 
    ӗҫ<n><ins> :  ӗҫпе 
    ӗҫ<n><abe> :  ӗҫсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><ben> :  ӗҫшӗн
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><nom> :  ӗҫӗм 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><gen> :  ӗҫӗмӗн 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><dat> :  ӗҫӗме 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><loc> :  ӗҫӗмре 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><abl> :  ӗҫӗмрен 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><ins> :  ӗҫӗмпе 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><abe> :  ӗҫӗмсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><ben> :  ӗҫӗмшӗн
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><nom> :  ӗҫӳ 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><gen> :  ӗҫӳн 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><dat> :  ӗҫне
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><loc> :  ӗҫӳнте 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><abl> :  ӗҫӳнтен 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><ins> :  ӗҫӳпе 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><abe> :  ӗҫӳсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><ben> :  ӗҫӳшӗн
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><nom> :  ӗҫӗ 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><gen> :  ӗҫӗн 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><dat> :  ӗҫне 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><loc> :  ӗҫӗнче 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><abl> :  ӗҫӗнчен 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><ins> :  ӗҫӗпе 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><abe> :  ӗҫӗсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><ben> :  ӗҫӗшӗн
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><nom> :  ӗҫӗмӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><gen> :  ӗҫӗмӗрӗн 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><dat> :  ӗҫӗмӗре 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><loc> :  ӗҫӗмӗрте 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><abl> :  ӗҫӗмӗртен 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><ins> :  ӗҫӗмӗрпе 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><abe> :  ӗҫӗмӗрсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><ben> :  ӗҫӗмӗршӗн
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><nom> :  ӗҫӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><gen> :  ӗҫӗрӗн 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><dat> :  ӗҫӗре 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><loc> :  ӗҫӗрте 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><abl> :  ӗҫӗртен 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><ins> :  ӗҫӗрпе 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><abe> :  ӗҫӗрсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><ben> :  ӗҫӗршӗн
    ӗҫ<n><pl><nom> :  ӗҫсем 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><gen> :  ӗҫсен 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><dat> :  ӗҫсене 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><loc> :  ӗҫсенче 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><abl> :  ӗҫсенчен 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><ins> :  ӗҫсемпе 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><abe> :  ӗҫсемсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><ben> :  ӗҫсемшӗн
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  ӗҫӗмсем 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  ӗҫӗмсен 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  ӗҫӗмсене 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  ӗҫӗмсенче 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  ӗҫӗмсенчен 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  ӗҫӗмсемпе 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  ӗҫӗмсемсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  ӗҫӗмсемшӗн
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  ӗҫӳсем 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  ӗҫӳсен 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  ӗҫӳсене 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  ӗҫӳсенче 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  ӗҫӳсенчен 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  ӗҫӳсемпе 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  ӗҫӳсемсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  ӗҫӳсемшӗн
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  ӗҫӗсем 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  ӗҫӗсен 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  ӗҫӗсене 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  ӗҫӗсенче 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  ӗҫӗсенчен 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  ӗҫӗсемпе 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  ӗҫӗсемсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  ӗҫӗсемшӗн
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  ӗҫӗмӗрсем 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  ӗҫӗмӗрсен 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  ӗҫӗмӗрсене 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  ӗҫӗмӗрсенче 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  ӗҫӗмӗрсенчен 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  ӗҫӗмӗрсемпе 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  ӗҫӗмӗрсемсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  ӗҫӗмӗрсемшӗн
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  ӗҫӗрсем 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  ӗҫӗрсен 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  ӗҫӗрсене 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  ӗҫӗрсенче 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  ӗҫӗрсенчен 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  ӗҫӗрсемпе 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  ӗҫӗрсемсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  ӗҫӗрсемшӗн
